Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 3-8-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act”.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 3-8-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adult” means an individual who has attained eighteen (18) years of age;

“Conservator” means a person appointed by the court to administer the property of an adult, including a person appointed under W.S.

3-3-101

through

3-3-1106

;

“Guardian” means a person appointed by the court to make decisions regarding the person of an adult, including a person appointed under W.S.

3-2-101

through

3-2-303

;

“Guardianship order” means an order appointing a guardian;

“Guardianship proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which an order for the appointment of a guardian is sought or has been issued;

“Incompetent person” means an adult for whom a guardian has been appointed;

“Party” means the respondent, petitioner, guardian, conservator or any other person allowed by the court to participate in a guardianship or protective proceeding;

“Protected person” means an adult for whom a protective order has been issued;

“Protective order” means an order appointing a conservator or other order related to management of an adult’s property;

“Protective proceeding” means a judicial proceeding in which a protective order is sought or has been issued;

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form;

“Respondent” means an adult for whom a protective order or the appointment of a guardian is sought;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“This act” means W.S.

3-8-101

through

3-8-502

.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Standing. —

Brother had standing to challenge the acceptance of a guardian report and conservator's annual accounting where he had a personal stake in prior proceedings involving his brother, and he had alleged that his sister was improperly discharging her duties as guardian and conservator. Bratton v. Blenkinsop (In re Bratton), 2015 WY 157, 364 P.3d 858,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2015), reh'g denied,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 9, 2016).

§ 3-8-103.
International application of act.

A court of this state may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this article and articles 2, 3 and 5 of this act.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 3-8-104.
Communication between courts.

A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this act. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the court shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.

Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records and other administrative matters without making a record.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 3-8-105.
Cooperation between courts.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding in this state, a court of this state may request the appropriate court of another state to do any of the following:

Hold an evidentiary hearing;

Order a person in that state to produce evidence or give testimony pursuant to procedures of that state;

Order that an evaluation or assessment be made of the respondent;

Order any appropriate investigation of a person involved in a proceeding;

Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript or other record of a hearing under paragraph (i) of this subsection or any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under paragraph (ii) of this subsection, and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance with an order under paragraph (iii) or (iv) of this subsection;

Issue any order necessary to assure the appearance in the proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the court to make a determination, including the respondent or the incompetent or protected person;

Issue an order authorizing the release of medical, financial, criminal or other relevant information in that state, including protected health information as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, as amended.

If a court of another state in which a guardianship or protective proceeding is pending requests assistance of the kind provided in subsection (a) of this section, a court of this state has jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making reasonable efforts to comply with the request.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 3-8-106.
Taking testimony in another state.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available, testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a witness be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is to be taken.

In a guardianship or protective proceeding, a court in this state may permit a witness located in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or other electronic means. A court of this state shall cooperate with the court of the other state in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this state by technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the best evidence rule.

History.

2013 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.